Utah statutes.
59-10-502.   Persons required to file returns.

An income tax return with respect to the tax imposed by this chapter shall be filed by:

(1)  every resident individual, estate, or trust required to file a federal income tax return for the taxable year; and

(2)  every nonresident individual, estate, or trust having federal gross income derived from sources within the state for the taxable year and required to file a federal income tax return for such taxable year.

